Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Bureau  of Labor and Industries, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $17,829,892.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$9,067,077 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Bureau of Labor
and Industries.
SECTION 3. (1) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,913,169 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of administrative expenses by the Bureau of Labor and  Industries from the Wage
Security Fund.
(2) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, expenditures by  the Bureau of Labor and
Industries for wage claim payments from the Wage Security Fund are not limited.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,842,766 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Bureau of Labor  and
Industries.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $261,416
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated  from the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the Bureau of Labor and Industries for the purpose  of implementing
the provisions of section 1, chapter 528, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 6.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 2